Utah statutes.
78B-6-609.   Mandamus and prohibition -- Judgment.

In any proceeding to obtain a writ of mandate or prohibition, if judgment is given for the applicant, he may recover the damages which were sustained, as found by the jury, or determined by the court, or referees upon a reference, ordered together with costs.  For damages and costs an execution may issue, and a peremptory mandate shall be awarded without delay.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

